Tennessee, session 114, SB2705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 313 of the Private Acts of 1949, as amended by Chapter 679 of
the Private Acts of 1949, Chapter 398 of the Private Acts of 1951, Chapter 170 of the Private
Acts of 1953, Chapter 219 of the Private Acts of 1953, Chapter 19 of the Private Acts of 1963,
Chapter 111 of the Private Acts of 1963, Chapter 366 of the Private Acts of 1968, Chapter 74 of
the Private Acts of 1969, Chapter 274 of the Private Acts of 1974, Chapter 138 of the Private
Acts of 1975, Chapter 306 of the Private Acts of 1982, Chapter 143 of the Private Acts of 1988,
Chapter 1 of the Private Acts of 1991, Chapter 161 of the Private Acts of 1996, Chapter 29 of
the Private Acts of 2003, Chapter 72 of the Private Acts of 2004, Chapter 1 of the Private Acts
of 2023, and any other acts amendatory thereto, are repealed effective August 31, 2028.
SECTION 2. The Hamblen County, Tennessee, Road Commission is abolished
effective August 31, 2028. Should a vacancy on the Road Commission occur prior to August
31, 2028, the vacancy shall not be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term. Nothing in this
Act shall be construed as having the effect of removing any incumbent from office or abridging
the term of any official prior to the end of the term for which they were elected. The amount of
SB2705
013356
- 1 -

compensation paid to members of the Road Commission shall be determined by the legislative
body of Hamblen County and is payable out of the county highway fund. The members of the
Road Commission shall elect one (1) of their members to serve as chairman. A majority of the
Road Commission shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of business.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of providing an efficient system of roads, highways, and
bridges and the building, construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of roads,
highways, and bridges in Hamblen County, Tennessee, the office of Road Superintendent for
said County is hereby created. At the regular August election in 2028, and every four (4) years
thereafter, a Road Superintendent shall be elected by popular vote by the qualified voters of
Hamblen County to serve a term of four (4) years. The Road Superintendent shall assume
office on September 1 following the election and shall continue to hold office until a successor is
elected and qualified. The qualifications and salary for the Road Superintendent shall be as
prescribed by the County Uniform Highway Law, Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter
7.
SECTION 4.
(a) The Road Superintendent shall have all the powers and duties set forth in the
County Uniform Highway Law, Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 7.
(b) In addition to the duties prescribed in subsection (a), the Road
Superintendent, at the Superintendent's discretion, may oversee the Hamblen County
Sanitation Department. Any supplemental salary arising out of and relating to such
oversight of the Hamblen County Sanitation Department shall be subject to the approval
of the legislative body of Hamblen County.
SECTION 5. Purchasing for the highway department shall be governed by the County
Uniform Highway Law, Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 7, and any other
purchasing laws applicable to Hamblen County.
SECTION 6. All laws or parts of laws in conflict with this act are hereby expressly
repealed. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
- 2 - 013356

held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can
be given without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of this act
are declared to be severable.
SECTION 7. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Hamblen County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the county legislative body and certified to the Secretary of State.
SECTION 8. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective upon being approved as provided in Section 7.
- 3 - 013356